Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-282
Artesian water; waste; penalty.

Any person or persons who own, occupy or have control of any farm, town lot or other real estate in the State of Nebraska, who fail or refuse to close or shut off any wastage of artesian water to the amount that section 46-281 allows on any farm, town lot or other real estate which they own, occupy or have control of, after being notified in writing by any person having the benefit of such mutual artesian water supply, within forty-eight hours after such notification, shall be subject to arrest, and shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor; and if such wastage be not abated within twenty-four hours after such arrest and conviction, it shall be a second offense against the provisions of section 46-281 and be subject to the same fine as for the first offense. Every like offense or neglect of each twenty-four hours thereafter shall be considered an additional offense against the provisions of section 46-281.

Laws 1897, c. 84, § 2, p. 358;

R.S.1913, § 3528;

C.S.1922, § 2928;

C.S.1929, § 46-173;

R.S.1943, § 46-282;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 264.